Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
378

EMPLOYMENT
PRACTICES

Part I. Discriminatory Practices

Section

378-1 Definitions

378-2 Discriminatory practices made unlawful;
offenses

defined

378-2.3 Equal pay; sex discrimination

378-2.5 Employer inquiries into conviction record

378-2.7 Employer inquiries into and
consideration of credit

history or credit report

378-3 Exceptions

378-4 Enforcement jurisdiction

378-5 Remedies

378-6 Inspection; investigation; records

378-7 to 10 Repealed

Part II. Lie Detector Tests

378-26 Definitions

378-26.5 Unlawful practices

378-27 Exception

378-27.5 Enforcement jurisdiction; complaint
against unlawful

practice

378-28 Power of department to prevent unlawful
practice

378-28.5 Investigation; oaths; affidavits;
subpoena;

witnesses; immunities

378-29 Rules

378-29.3 Penalties

Part III. Unlawful Suspension or Discharge

378-31 Definitions

378-32 Unlawful suspension, barring, discharge,
withholding

pay, demoting, or discrimination

378-33 Complaint against unlawful suspension,
discharge,

or discrimination

378-34 Proceeding and hearing on complaint

378-35 Findings and order

378-36 Judicial review

378-37 Enforcement of order; judgment rendered
thereon

378-38 Rules and regulations

Part IV. Fair Representation

378-51 Action against labor organization,
limitation

Part V. Whistleblowers' Protection Act

A. General Provisions

378-61 Definitions

378-62 Discharge of, threats to, or
discrimination against

employee for reporting violations of law

378-63 Civil actions for injunctive relief or
damages

378-64 Remedies ordered by court

378-65 Penalties for violations

378-66 Collective bargaining and confidentiality
rights,

takes precedence

378-67 Compensation for employee participation in

investigation, hearing, or inquiry

378-68 Notices of employee protections and
obligations

378-69 Conflict with common law, precedence

B. Public Employees

378-70 Protected disclosure by a public employee

Part VI. Victims Protections

A. General Provisions

378-71 Definitions

B. Victims Leave

378-72 Leave of absence for domestic or sexual
violence

378-73 Relationship to other leaves

378-74 Effect on employment and collective
bargaining

agreements; benefits

C. Reasonable Accommodations in the
Workplace

378-81 Reasonable accommodations

378-82 Civil actions

Part VII. Opportunity to Express Milk

378-91 Definitions

378-92 Opportunity to express milk

378-93 Civil actions for injunctive relief or
damages

Law Journals and
Reviews

Federal Labor Law
Preemption and Hawaii's Work-Injury Discharge Law. 16 HBJ, no. 1, at 37 (1981).

Employee Rights Under
Judicial Scrutiny: Prevalent Policy Discourse and the Hawai‘i Supreme Court.
14 UH L. Rev. 189 (1992).

Caught in the Backdraft: The Implications of Ricci v. DeStefano
on Voluntary Compliance and Title VII. 32 UH L. Rev. 463 (2010).

Case Notes

Does not bar common law
remedies; exclusive remedy for constructive discharge claim based on sexual
harassment. 634 F. Supp. 684 (1986).

If plaintiff was alleging
public policy wrongful discharge claim based on Parnar v. Americana Hotels,
Inc., and §378-32(2), plaintiff's claim was barred, since this chapter provided
sufficient remedy for its violation. 938 F. Supp. 1503 (1996).

Plaintiff's resort to a
possible common law action of violation of public policy barred, where
plaintiff was making claims of retaliation through wrongful denial of promotion
based upon § [sic] 378; that type of claim was analogous to a wrongful
discharge claim and § [sic] 378 provided a sufficient remedy for retaliation. 75
F. Supp. 2d 1113 (1999).

Defendant's countermotion for partial summary judgment denied
as to claim premised under this chapter of the Hawaii Discriminatory Employment
Practices Act [sic] (HDEPA), where defendant could be held individually liable
under the HDEPA barring application of other defenses. 112 F. Supp. 2d 1041
(2000).

Plaintiff did not have to
obtain a right to sue letter from Hawaii civil rights commission to bring
plaintiff's chapter 378 claims for sexual harassment. 159 F. Supp. 2d 1211
(2001).

Plaintiff failed to
properly state a claim for relief under the Americans with Disabilities Act or
this chapter, where plaintiff argued that reference to general "statutory
civil rights" in the title of the second count of the complaint was
sufficient. 284 F. Supp. 2d 1261 (2003).

Plaintiff asserted
discrimination claims against plaintiff's supervisor and employer, and the
alleged parent company of the employer, pursuant to this chapter and federal
law. Defendants' motion for partial dismissal or alternatively, for partial
summary judgment granted in part (e.g., claims based on national origin and
aiding and abetting) and denied in part (e.g., claims based on color). 322 F.
Supp. 2d 1101 (2004).

Where plaintiff asserted
viable claims against defendants under 42 U.S.C. §1981, Title VII, and this
chapter, and each of the statutes provided a sufficient remedy such that the
court did not need to fashion any further remedy under the public policy
exception, defendants' motion for partial summary judgment granted on
plaintiff's claim for violation of public policy. 322 F. Supp. 2d 1101 (2004).

Plaintiff's [chapters]
368 and 378 state law claims against the county were time-barred under §46-72,
where plaintiff never provided the county written notice of plaintiff's claim.
504 F. Supp. 2d 969 (2007).

Plaintiff could not state a claim for wrongful termination in
violation of public policy based on the same conduct as alleged in plaintiff's
federal claims under Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 and state claims
under this chapter because these statutes already provide a sufficient remedy.
721 F. Supp. 2d 947 (2010).

The Hawaii supreme court in French did not demonstrate a
clear attempt to keep Hawaii law distinct from the federal Americans with
Disabilities Act (ADA) such that a claim under the Hawaii discrimination law
raises issues sufficiently distinct from an ADA claim so as to prevent
application of the first-to-file-rule. 728 F. Supp. 2d 1096 (2010).

Defendant employer's motion for summary judgment granted on
plaintiff's allegation of termination in violation of public policy where
plaintiff could not show that plaintiff's opposition to defendant's program was
anything more than a disagreement with company management regarding an internal
business decision. 760 F. Supp. 2d 1005
(2010).

For Eleventh Amendment purposes, a suit against a state
official in that official's capacity is no different from a suit against the
State itself; Hawaii has not consented to suit in federal court for claims
under this chapter, and sovereign immunity thus barred plaintiff teacher's
§378-2 claims against the Hawaii department of education and the department of
education superintendent in the superintendent's official capacity. 855 F.
Supp. 2d 1155 (2012).

Plaintiff's charges filed with the equal employment
opportunity commission were deemed "dual-filed" with the Hawaii civil
rights commission. Plaintiff timely filed the charge for claims under this
chapter based on plaintiff's termination within the 180-day time limitation.
907 F. Supp. 2d 1143 (2012).

Genuine issue of material fact existed as to plaintiff's
hostile work environment claims based on national origin and age, where
plaintiff said that supervisor called plaintiff, among other things, "dumb
Mexican" and "wetback", and referred to plaintiff and other
older workers as "old bags" and "old clunkers". 927 F.
Supp. 2d 978 (2013).

Plaintiff failed to establish a prima facie case of
retaliation where the fifteen year span of time between plaintiff's 1985
discrimination complaint and the adverse employment action of the case was too
long to permit a causal connection to be inferred between the protected
activity and the adverse employment action. 119 H. 288 (App.), 196 P.3d 290
(2008).

Exceptions enumerated by the Ninth Circuit Court of Appeals
in Sosa v. Hiraoka apply when determining whether a plaintiff may proceed with
a suit for violations of part I of this chapter against a party not named in a
Hawaii civil rights commission charge; adopting the Ninth Circuit's precedent
would be consistent with the legislature's intention of providing employment
discrimination victims with the same remedies under state and federal law. 130
H. 325 (App.), 310 P.3d 1026 (2013).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next